Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2745XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 420 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Prohibition of Native 1 American mascots. 2 1. On or after January 1, 2027, a public or nonpublic school 3 shall not have or adopt a name, symbol, or image that depicts 4 or refers to a Native American tribe, individual, custom, or 5 tradition to be used as a mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, 6 or team name of the school. 7 2. This section shall not apply to a school under the 8 control of a Native American tribe and under the purview of the 9 bureau of Indian education. 10